West Virginia, session 2025, SB148.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. POWERS AND DUTIES OF PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION. §24-2-1s. Jurisdiction over the premises of the United States Armed Forces or West Virginia National Guard. (a) To encourage the development of energy infrastructure and strategic resources that will ensure the continuity of governmental operations in situations of emergency, the provision of electricity from a high impact industrial business development district, as certified pursuant to §5B-2-21(b), to meet only the electrical needs of the premises of the United States Armed Forces or the West Virginia National Guard shall not constitute a public service under §24-2-1 effective July 1, 2025. (b) The electrical output of any certified high impact industrial business development district to the premises of the United States Armed Forces or the West Virginia National Guard, which is subject to a power purchase agreement, shall not be subject to any limitations on power purchase agreements or the net metering and interconnection standards as set forth in §24-2F-8.